Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 3151.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3152.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Adult” means an individual who has attained 18 years of age.

“Conservator” means a person appointed by the court to administer the property of an adult.

“Guardian” means a person appointed by the court to make decisions regarding an adult, including a person appointed under this title.

“Guardianship order” means an order appointing a guardian.

“Guardianship proceeding” means a judicial proceeding in which an order for the appointment of a guardian is sought or has been issued.

“Incapacitated person” means an adult for whom a guardian has been appointed.

“Party” means the respondent, petitioner, guardian, conservator, or any other person allowed by the court to participate in a guardianship or protective proceeding.

“Person,” except in the term “incapacitated person” or “protected person,” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Protected person” means an adult for whom a protective order has been issued.

“Protective order” means an order appointing a conservator or other order related to the management of an adult’s property.

“Protective proceeding” means a judicial proceeding in which a protective order is sought or has been issued.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Respondent” means an adult for whom a protective order or the appointment of a guardian is sought.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the U.S. Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3153.
International application of act.

A court of this State may treat a foreign country as if it were a state for the purpose of applying this subchapter and subchapters 2, 3, and 5 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3154.
Communication between courts.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court in this State may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter. The Probate Division may allow the parties to participate in the communication. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the court shall make a record of the communication. The record may be limited to the fact that the communication occurred.

Courts may communicate concerning schedules, calendars, court records, and other administrative matters without making a record.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3155.
Cooperation between courts.

In a guardianship or protective proceeding in this State, a court of this State may request the appropriate court of another state to do any of the following:

hold an evidentiary hearing;

order a person in that state to produce evidence or give testimony pursuant to procedures of that state;

order that an evaluation or assessment be made of the respondent;

order any appropriate investigation of a person involved in a proceeding;

forward to the court of this State a certified copy of the transcript or other record of a hearing under subdivision (1) of this subsection or any other proceeding, any evidence otherwise produced under subdivision (2) of this subsection, and any evaluation or assessment prepared in compliance with an order under subdivision (3) or (4) of this subsection;

issue any order necessary to ensure the appearance in the proceeding of a person whose presence is necessary for the court to make a determination, including the respondent or the incapacitated or protected person;

issue an order authorizing the release of medical, financial, criminal, or other relevant information in that state, including protected health information as defined in 45 C.F.R. Section 164.504, as amended, but any information so disclosed may be admitted in a proceeding in this State only in accordance with the laws of this State.

If a court of another state in which a guardianship or protective proceeding is pending requests assistance of the kind provided in subsection (a) of this section, a court of this State has jurisdiction for the limited purpose of granting the request or making reasonable efforts to comply with the request in accordance with the laws of this State.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3156.
Taking testimony in another state.

In a guardianship or protective proceeding, in addition to other procedures that may be available, testimony of a witness who is located in another state may be offered by deposition or other means allowable in this State for testimony taken in another state. The Probate Division of the Superior Court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a witness be taken in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony is to be taken.

In a guardianship or protective proceeding, a Probate Division of the Superior Court in this State may permit a witness located in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone or audiovisual or other electronic means. The Probate Division of this State shall cooperate with the court of the other state in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a Probate Division of the Superior Court of this State by technological means that do not produce an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the best evidence rule.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.